Utah statutes.
23-19-16.   Licenses obtained from agents of division.

(1)  Licenses provided for in Sections 23-19-17 through 23-19-27 may be obtained from the division or one of its authorized wildlife license agents.

(2)  Licenses provided for in Sections 23-19-17.5, 23-19-34.7, and 23-19-36 may be obtained only from the division.



Amended by Chapter 195, 2000 General Session

